District of Columbia statutes.
6-1115

Effective date.

This subchapter shall become effective as provided for acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in § 1-206.02(c)(1). Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon the effective date of this subchapter, all pending applications for permits shall be subject to this subchapter and no outstanding permits shall be renewed or reissued except in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-144, § 17, 25 DCR 6939
Because of the codification of D.C. Law 5-69 as subchapter II of this chapter, and the designation of the preexisting text of Chapter 11 as subchapter I, “subchapter” has been substituted for “chapter,” where applicable, in this section.
1973 Ed., § 5-835.
1981 Ed., § 5-1015.